Louisiana, session 2026, HB1246.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:98.9 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§98.9. "Jada's Law"; sober release requirement
A. This Section may be cited as "Jada's Law".
B. Following an arrest for operating while impaired in violation of R.S.
14:98 or 98.6, the custodial agency may hold an individual who is presumed to be
under the influence of alcoholic beverages pursuant to R.S. 32:662 until a safe
release is feasible.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to deny or restrict the
entitlement of a person to bail pursuant to the Code of Criminal Procedure or limit
the authority of a court to impose additional conditions of release in accordance with
applicable law.
D. The provisions of this Section do not apply to any individual who is
seventeen years of age or younger.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.